lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX A Y 763
SFX A   íst         tu         èíst
SFX A   íst         te¹        èíst
SFX A   íst         te         èíst
SFX A   íst         teme       èíst
SFX A   íst         tete       èíst
SFX A   íst         tou        èíst
SFX A   íst         ti         èíst
SFX A   íst         tìme       èíst
SFX A   íst         tìte       èíst
SFX A   íst         etl        èíst
SFX A   íst         etla       èíst
SFX A   íst         etlo       èíst
SFX A   íst         etli       èíst
SFX A   íst         etly       èíst
SFX A   íst         ta         èíst
SFX A   íst         touc       èíst
SFX A   íst         touce      èíst
SFX A   íst         ìtu        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìte¹       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìte        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìteme      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtete      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtou       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ì»         [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ì»me       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ì»te       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtl        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtla       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtlo       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtli       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtly       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìta        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtouc      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ìtouce     [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edu        [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ede¹       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ede        [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edeme      [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edete      [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edou       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eï         [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eïme       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eïte       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edl        [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edla       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edlo       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edli       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edly       [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eda        [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edouc      [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edouce     [^èdnt]íst
SFX A   ést         esu        nést
SFX A   ést         ese¹       nést
SFX A   ést         ese        nést
SFX A   ést         eseme      nést
SFX A   ést         esete      nést
SFX A   ést         esou       nést
SFX A   ést         es         nést
SFX A   ést         esme       nést
SFX A   ést         este       nést
SFX A   ést         esl        nést
SFX A   ést         esla       nést
SFX A   ést         eslo       nést
SFX A   ést         esli       nést
SFX A   ést         esly       nést
SFX A   ést         esa        nést
SFX A   ést         esouc      nést
SFX A   ést         esouce     nést
SFX A   ést         etu        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         ete¹       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         ete        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eteme      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etete      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etou       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         e»         [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         e»me       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         e»te       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etl        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etla       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etlo       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etli       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etly       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eta        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etouc      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etouce     [^n]ést
SFX A   ást         adu        ást
SFX A   ást         ade¹       ást
SFX A   ást         ade        ást
SFX A   ást         ademe      ást
SFX A   ást         adete      ást
SFX A   ást         adou       ást
SFX A   ást         aï         ást
SFX A   ást         aïme       ást
SFX A   ást         aïte       ást
SFX A   ást         adl        ást
SFX A   ást         adla       ást
SFX A   ást         adlo       ást
SFX A   ást         adli       ást
SFX A   ást         adly       ást
SFX A   ást         ada        ást
SFX A   ást         adouc      ást
SFX A   ást         adouce     ást
SFX A   ézt         ezu        ézt
SFX A   ézt         eze¹       ézt
SFX A   ézt         eze        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezeme      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezete      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezou       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ez         ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezme       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezte       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezl        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezla       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezlo       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezli       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezly       ézt
SFX A   ézt         eza        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezouc      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezouce     ézt
SFX A   rát         eru        rát
SFX A   rát         ere¹       rát
SFX A   rát         ere        rát
SFX A   rát         ereme      rát
SFX A   rát         erete      rát
SFX A   rát         erou       rát
SFX A   rát         er         rát
SFX A   rát         erme       rát
SFX A   rát         erte       rát
SFX A   rát         era        rát
SFX A   rát         erouc      rát
SFX A   rát         erouce     rát
SFX A   lát         elu        lát
SFX A   lát         ele¹       lát
SFX A   lát         ele        lát
SFX A   lát         eleme      lát
SFX A   lát         elete      lát
SFX A   lát         elou       lát
SFX A   lát         el         lát
SFX A   lát         elme       lát
SFX A   lát         elte       lát
SFX A   lát         ela        lát
SFX A   lát         elouc      lát
SFX A   lát         elouce     lát
SFX A   át          u          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          e¹         [^lr]át
SFX A   át          e          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          eme        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ete        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ou         [^lr]át
SFX A   át          i          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ìme        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ìte        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          al         át
SFX A   át          ala        át
SFX A   át          alo        át
SFX A   át          ali        át
SFX A   át          aly        át
SFX A   t           i          ct
SFX A   i           t          ci
SFX A   éct         eèu        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eku        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eèe¹       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eèe        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eèeme      éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eèete      éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eèou       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekou       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eè         éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ec         éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eème       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ecme       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eète       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ecte       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekl        [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekla       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eklo       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekli       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekly       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eka        [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekouc      [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekouce     [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèu        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uku        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèe¹       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèe        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèeme      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèete      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uèou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uè         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uc         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uème       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucme       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uète       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucte       ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kl         ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kla        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          klo        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kli        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kly        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uka        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukouc      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukouce     ouc[it]
SFX A   ci          hu         oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾u        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾e¹       oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾e        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾eme      oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾ete      oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hou        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ù¾ou       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hl         oc[it]
