lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
aktivovat/ATN
apretovat/ATN
bácnout/ATN
běľet/ATN
bojkotovat/ATN
brouknout/ATN
centrovat/ATN
cuknout/AN
čílit/AN
decentrovat/ATN
dekrementovat/ATN
deregulovat/ATN
dilatovat/ATN
dmýchávat/ATN
dobrousit/ACN
dočistit/ACN
doeditovat/ATN
dohlučet/AN
dohysterčit/AN
doklepat/AJTN
dokosit/ATN
dokumetovat/ATN
dolítnout/AN
doměřovat/ATN
donutit/ACN
dopeskovat/ATN
doposlechnout/ATN
doradit/ATN
doředit/ATN
doskučet/AN
dostavět/AJTN
dosýčkovat/AN
doąponovat/ATN
dotitulkovat/ATN
doúčtovat/ATN
dovolit/ATN
dozdobit/ATN
dráľkovat/ATN
durdit/AN
etablovat/ATN
falcovat/ATN
flámovat/AN
fúzovat/AN
hafnout/AN
heverovat/ATN
holit/ATN
hromadit/ATN
hvězdičkovat/ATN
chránit/ATN
iluminovat/ATN
injikovat/ATN
invalidizovat/ATN
jizvit/ATN
kapalnět/AJN
klasifikovat/ATN
klovnout/ATN
kolonizovat/ATN
konfirmovat/ATN
konzumovat/ATN
koulet/AJTN
krojovat/ATN
křtít/ATN
kverulovat/ATN
lapit/ATN
leľet/AN
lomit/ATN
malovat/ATN
mechovatět/AJN
mizet/AN
mračit/ATN
mythisovat/ATN
nacestovat/ATN
nadechovat/ATN
nadrbat/AJTN
naformulovat/ATN
nahuą»ovat/ATN
naklepnout/ATN
nakrčit/ATN
nalahvovat/ATN
naloupit/ATN
namořit/ATN
napěchovat/ATN
napořizovat/ATN
nareľírovat/ATN
naschnout/AN
nastavit/ATN
nasvěcovat/ATN
naątepovat/ATN
natřít/ATN
navlhnout/ATN
naľrat/ATN
nostrifikovat/ATN
obestřít/ATN
obkovat/AJTN
obloudit/ACN
obroubit/ATN
obtahovat/ATN
očadit/ACN
odblokovat/ATN
odčleňovat/ATN
odfiknout/ATN
odhodit/ACN
odkaąlat/ATN
odkráčet/AJTN
odlehnout/ATN
odmastit/ACN
odmyslet/AN
odpichovat/ATN
odpolitizovat/ATN
odrezovat/ATN
odsignalizovat/ATN
odstrčit/ATN
odąoupnout/ATN
odtlouct/ATN
odvděčit/ATN
odvzduąňovat/ATN
ohlédnout/AN
ochočit/ATN
okolkovat/ATN
okusovat/ATN
omilostňovat/ATN
opatrovat/ATN
oploątit/ATN
oprotektorovat/ATN
osamět/AJN
osmělit/ATN
osvítit/ACN
oteplit/ATN
ověnčit/ATN
oznámit/ATN
paketovat/ATN
párovat/ATN
penetrovat/ATN
plácnout/ATN
plouľit/AN
poctít/ATN
podfakturovat/ATN
podletět/ATN
podrazit/ACXN
podsunovat/ATN
pogumovat/ATN
pohryzat/AJTN
pokácet/AJTN
pokrátit/ACN
polepąit/ATN
pomazlit/ATN
ponořit/ATN
poplavu/A
porakouątit/ATN
posednout/ATN
posterizovat/ATN
posvětit/ACN
potit/ACN
pováľit/ATN
povzbuzovat/ATN
pozvednout/ATN
preparovat/ATN
procitnout/AN
produkovat/ATN
prohnojit/ATN
prokádrovat/ATN
prokovit/ATXN
prolistovat/ATN
promlčovat/ATN
proplachtit/AN
prořezat/AJTN
prosolit/ATN
proąaąkovat/ATN
proteplit/ATN
prováľit/ATN
prozvonit/ATN
přebruąovat/ATN
předděrovat/ATN
předkroutit/ACN
předprogramovat/ATN
předtančit/ATN
přeformovat/ATN
přehrazovat/ATN
překlepnout/ATN
překročit/ATN
přelanařit/AN
přemazat/ATN
přeorganizovat/ATN
přeplouľit/AN
přeruąovat/ATN
přesladit/ACN
přesunout/ATN
přetáčet/AJTN
přetrumfnout/ATN
převláčet/AJTN
přeľvykovat/ATN
přidrátovat/ATN
přiinstalovat/ATN
přikreslovat/ATN
přimáčknout/ATN
připamatovat/ATN
připojit/ATN
přiskakovat/AN
přistřihovat/ATN
přitančit/ATN
přivázat/ATN
přizvukovat/AN
pytlovat/ATN
rebilancovat/ATN
reprezentovat/ATN
rozblátit/ACN
rozednít/AN
rozchuravět/AJTN
rozlétnout/AN
roznoľit/ATN
rozpulsovat/AN
roząkvařit/ATN
rozvazovat/ATN
rýmovat/ATN
sčesat/AJTN
sesmolit/ATN
sflikovat/ATN
skandalisovat/ATN
sladovat/ATN
smiřovat/ATN
spařovat/ATN
spoluvládnout/ATN
sterilizovat/ATN
stvrdit/ACN
svraątit/ATN
ąkrabat/AJTN
ątudovat/ATN
tipnout/ATN
trknout/ATN
ubrebentit/ACN
uhořet/ATN
ukovat/AJTN
umořovat/ATN
upravovovat/ATN
uskutečňovat/ATN
uąkvařit/ATN
utuľovat/ATN
vadit/AN
věąet/AJTN
vléct/ATN
vplynout/ATN
vtělit/ATN
vybuchnout/ATN
vydojit/ATN
vyhmátnout/ATN
vyjezdit/ATN
vykročit/ATN
vyloučit/ATN
vynahradit/ACN
vyplíľit/AN
vypuzovat/ATN
vyskytovat/AN
vystřihnout/ACN
vyątafírovat/ATN
vytřít/ATN
vyvyąovat/ATN
vzlítnout/AN
zablokovat/ATN
začerňovat/ATN
zahanbit/ATN
zachladit/ACN
zaklonit/ATN
zaktivovat/ATN
zamaskovat/ATN
zaodporovat/AN
zápolit/AN
zarýpat/AJTN
zasrat/ATN
zaąmiknout/ATN
zatraktivnit/ATN
zavirblovat/AN
zaľehovat/ATN
zčeřit/ATN
zduplikovat/ATN
zevąedňovat/ATN
zhudebnit/ATN
zjizvit/ATN
zkostnatět/AJN
zlepąovat/ATN
zmlazovat/ATN
zneklidnět/AJTN
znovuobjevovat/ATN
zpečetit/ATN
zproblematizovat/ATN
zrealizovat/ATN
ztemnit/ATN
zůstavit/ATN
zvrznout/ATN
